North Dakota, session 69, HB1232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 12 of section 57-02-01 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
12. a. "Residential property" means all property, or portions of property, used by an
individual or group of individuals as a dwelling, including property or future
dwelling as provided in this subsection.
b. The term includes:
(1) A tract of land upon which athree or fewer mobile home ishomes are located
but.
(2) A vacant platted lot located within city limits if the intended use of the lot is
residential in nature. An assessor may determine the intended use of the lot
based on the purpose for which the lot is zoned under chapters 11 - 33 ,
40 - 47, 58 - 03, or any other provision authorizing a political subdivision to
establish or enforce zoning regulations, or the intended use for the lot
expressed in the plat documents.
c. The term does not including hotelinclude:
(1) Hotel and motel accommodations required to be licensed under chapter
23-09 nor structures.
(2) Structures providing living accommodations for four or more separate family
units nor any.
(3) A tract of land upon which four or more mobile homes are located.
Page No. 1 25.0368.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2024.
Page No. 2 25.0368.01000